Massachusetts, session 194th, H875.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 55 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting the following definitions:--
“Chief executive officer”, the highest-ranking officer or decision-making individual with
authority over the corporation’s affairs.
“Corporation”, a for-profit corporation, company, limited liability company, limited
partnership, business trust, business association, or other similar for-profit entity.
“Foreign-influenced corporation”, a corporation for which at least one of the following
conditions is met: (1) a single foreign owner holds, owns, controls, or otherwise has direct or
indirect beneficial ownership of one percent or more of the total equity, outstanding voting
shares, membership units, or other applicable ownership interests of the corporation; (2) two or
more foreign owners, in aggregate, hold, own, control, or otherwise have direct or indirect
beneficial ownership of five percent or more of the total equity, outstanding voting shares,
of 3

membership units, or other applicable ownership interests of the corporation; or (3) a foreign
owner participates directly or indirectly in the corporation’s decision-making process with
respect to the corporation’s political activities in the United States.
“Foreign investor”, a person or entity that (1) holds, owns, controls, or otherwise has
direct or indirect beneficial ownership of equity, outstanding voting shares, membership units, or
other applicable ownership interests of a corporation, and (2) is a government of a foreign
country, or a foreign political party, or a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or
other combination of persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place of
business in a foreign country, or an individual outside the United States who is not a citizen of
the United States or a national of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for
permanent residence.
“Foreign owner”, (1) a foreign investor or (2) a corporation wherein a foreign investor
holds, owns, controls, or otherwise has directly or indirectly acquired a beneficial ownership of
equity or voting shares in an amount that is equal to or greater than 50 percent of the total equity
or outstanding voting shares.
SECTION 2. Section 8 of said Chapter 55 is hereby amended by inserting after the
second paragraph the following new paragraphs:--
No foreign-influenced corporation shall make an independent expenditure, or an
electioneering communication expenditure, or a contribution to an independent expenditure PAC
as defined in Section 18A, or a contribution to a ballot question committee, or an expenditure for
the purpose of promoting or opposing a charter change, referendum question, constitutional
amendment, or other question submitted to the voters.
of 3

Any corporation that makes an independent expenditure, or an electioneering
communication expenditure, or a contribution to an independent expenditure PAC as defined in
section 18A, or a contribution to a ballot question committee, or an expenditure for the purpose
of promoting or opposing a charter change, referendum question, constitutional amendment, or
other question submitted to the voters shall, within 7 business days after making such
expenditure or contribution, file with the director, a statement of certification, signed by the chief
executive officer under penalty of perjury, avowing that, after due inquiry, the corporation was
not a foreign-influenced corporation on the date such expenditure or contribution was made.
SECTION 3. Section 18G of Chapter 55 is further amended by inserting after the second
sentence of paragraph two the following:--
Unless the individual, corporation, group, association, labor union or other entity making
the independent expenditure or electioneering communication has received a statement of
certification from each person or entity required to be listed in the top contributors, avowing
under penalty of perjury that none of the funds used to make each such person or entity’s
contribution were derived from foreign-influenced corporations, the advertisement or
communication shall also include the statement: “Some of the funds used to pay for this message
may have been provided by foreign-influenced corporations.” The individual, corporation, group,
association, labor union or other entity making the independent expenditure or electioneering
communication shall be entitled to rely on such a statement of certification provided by the
contributor, unless the individual, corporation, group, association, labor union or other entity has
actual knowledge that such certification is false.
of 3